trunk/apertium-fr-es/apertium-fr-es.es.dix
    <pardef n="qu/erer__vblex">
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiere</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiere</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiereis</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isieren</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isieres</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiese</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiese</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isieseis</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiesen</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isieses</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiéremos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>isiésemos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eramos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eramos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ere</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__canta" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ered</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ered</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eremos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erer</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erer</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erida</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eridas</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erido</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eridos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eriendo</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eriéndo</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erremos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>errá</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>errán</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>errás</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erré</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erréis</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erría</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erría</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erríais</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erríamos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>errían</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>errías</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eráis</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erámo</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémo" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erámos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantémos" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eré</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantá" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eréd</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantád" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eréis</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erér</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantár" />
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ería</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ería</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eríais</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>eríamos</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erían</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>erías</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iera</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iera</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iera</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieran</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieran</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ieras</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iere</l>
        <r>erer<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
      </e>
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>iere</l>

      <e lm="querer"><i>qu</i><par n="qu/erer__vblex"/></e>
      <e lm="querer sacar tajada" a="webform"><i>qu</i><par n="qu/erer__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sacar<b/>tajada</l><r><g><b/>sacar<b/>tajada</g></r></p></e>
